Maine, session 132, LD1823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA c. 313 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 313
PUBLIC POSTING OF CRIMINAL CASE DECISIONS
§2401. Public posting of criminal case decisions
The Attorney General shall post to the publicly accessible website of the Office of the
Attorney General the final decision of a criminal case decided within the State within 60
days of the case's final disposition. A clerk of the District Court or a clerk of the Superior
Court shall post to that clerk's publicly accessible website the final decision of a criminal
case decided within that prosecutorial district within 60 days of the case's final disposition.
A clerk of the Unified Criminal Docket, as defined in section 1003, subsection 11, shall
post to the clerk's publicly accessible website the final decision of a criminal case decided
within the State within 60 days of the case's final disposition.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.